District of Columbia statutes.
29-405.27

Voting for directors.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, directors of a membership corporation shall be elected by a plurality of the votes cast by the members entitled to vote in the election at a meeting at which a quorum is present.

(b)

Unless permitted by the articles of incorporation or bylaws, members shall not have a right to cumulate their votes for directors.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720